Utah statutes.
77-37-2.   Definitions.
In this chapter:
(1)  "Child" means a person who is younger than 18 years of age, unless
otherwise specified in statute.  The rights to information as extended in this
chapter also apply to the parents, custodian, or legal guardians of children.
(2)  "Family member" means spouse, child, sibling, parent, grandparent, or
legal guardian.
(3)  "Victim" means a person against whom a crime has allegedly been
committed, or against whom an act has allegedly been committed by a juvenile
or incompetent adult, which would have been a crime if committed by a
competent adult.
(4)  "Witness" means any person who has been subpoenaed or is expected to be
summoned to testify for the prosecution or who by reason of having relevant
information is subject to call or likely to be called as a witness for the
prosecution, whether any action or proceeding has commenced.
